District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.09

Decree of sale.

If the right of the complainant, or of any of the parties to the suit, to the lien herein provided for shall be established, the court shall decree a sale of the land and premises or the estate and interest therein of the person who, as owner, contracted for the erection, repair, improvement of, or addition to the building, as aforesaid.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1386, ch. 854, § 1247
1981 Ed., § 38-111.
1973 Ed., § 38-111.